da: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og håndarbejde > Musikinstrumenter – tilbehør > Messingblæser – tilbehør > Dæmpere til messingblæsere: Kopdæmpere; Harmondæmpere; Stempeldæmpere; Øvelsesdæmpere; Lige dæmpere
vi: Nghệ thuật và giải trí > Sở thích và nghệ thuật sáng tạo > Phụ kiện dàn nhạc và nhạc cụ > Phụ kiện kèn đồng > Thiết bị chặn tiếng dùng cho kèn đồng: Cốc bít chặn tiếng; Thiết bị chặn tiếng Harmon; Pít tông chặn tiếng; Thiết bị chặn tiếng dùng khi luyện tập; Thiết bị chặn tiếng thẳng
th: ศิลปะและความบันเทิง > งานอดิเรกและศิลปะสร้างสรรค์ > เครื่องดนตรีและอุปกรณ์ออร์เคสตรา > อุปกรณ์เครื่องเป่าทองเหลือง > ที่ลดเสียงสำหรับเครื่องเป่าทองเหลือง: คัพมิวท์; ฮาร์มอนมิวท์; พลันเจอร์มิวท์; แพรคทีซมิวท์; สเตรทมิวท์
ro-RO: Artă și divertisment > Hobby-uri și artă > Accesorii pentru instrumente muzicale și orchestră > Accesorii pentru instrumente din alamă > Surdine pentru instrumente din alamă: Surdine în formă de cupă; Surdină Harmon; Surdine în formă de piston; Surdine pentru exersare; Surdine drepte
nl: Kunst en entertainment > Hobby's en creatieve vaardigheden > Accessoires voor muziekinstrumenten > Accessoires voor koperen blaasinstrumenten > Dempers voor koperen blaasinstrumenten: Bekerdempers; Harmon-dempers; Plunger-dempers; Oefendempers; Rechte dempers
zh-TW: 藝術/娛樂 > 嗜好和創作藝術 > 樂器配件 > 銅管樂器配件 > 銅管樂器弱音器: 杯式弱音器; 哈蒙弱音器; 橡膠弱音器; 練習用弱音器; 直式弱音器
hr-HR: Umjetnost i zabava > Hobiji i kreativne umjetnosti > Pribor za glazbala i orkestar > Pribor za limena puhaća glazbala > Sordine za limena puhaća glazbala: Cup sordine; Harmon sordine; Plunger sordine; Sordine za vježbu; Ravne sordine
cs: Umění a zábava > Hobby, hudba a výtvarné umění > Hudební nástroje – příslušenství > Žesťové nástroje – příslušenství > Dusítka k žesťovým nástrojům: Cup dusítka; Harmon dusítka; Plunger dusítka; Cvičební dusítka; Rovná dusítka
lt-LT: Menai ir pramogos > Hobiai ir menai > Muzikos instrumentai ir orkestro priedai > Varinių pučiamųjų instrumentų priedai > Varinių pučiamųjų instrumentų surdinos: Varpų surdinos; „Harmon“ tipo surdinos; Stūmoklinės surdinos; Mokomosios surdinos; Tiesios surdinos
de: Kunst & Unterhaltung > Hobby & Kunst > Zubehör für Musikinstrumente > Zubehör für Blechblasinstrumente > Dämpfer für Blechinstrumente: Cup-Dämpfer; Harmon-Dämpfer; Plunger-Dämpfer; Übungsdämpfer; Straight-Dämpfer
ru: Искусство и развлечения > Хобби и творчество > Аксессуары для музыкальных инструментов и игры в оркестре > Аксессуары для медных духовых инструментов > Сурдины для медных духовых инструментов: Чашечные сурдины; Сурдины-квакушки; Плунжерные сурдины; Сурдины для домашних занятий; Прямые сурдины
bg-BG: Изкуства и развлечения > Хобита и творчески изкуства > Аксесоари за музикални инструменти и оркестри > Аксесоари за духови инструменти > Сурдини за духови инструменти: Сурдина; Сурдинa Wah-wah; Сурдина „плунжер“; Учебни сурдини; Прави сурдини
tr: Sanat ve Eğlence > Hobiler ve Sanatsal Çalışmalar > Müzik Aleti ve Orkestra Aksesuarları > Bakır Nefesli Çalgı Aksesuarları > Üflemeli Çalgı Susturucuları: Kupa Susturucuları; Harmon Susturucuları; Piston Susturucuları; Çalışma Susturucuları; Düz Susturucular
pt-PT: Artes e lazer > Passatempos e artes criativas > Acessórios de instrumentos musicais e orquestra > Acessórios de instrumentos de sopro > Surdinas de instrumentos de sopro: Surdinas cup; Surdinas harmon; Surdinas plunger; Surdinas de ensaio; Surdinas retas
ja: 芸術・エンターテイメント > 趣味・コレクション > 楽器関連用品 > 金管楽器用品 > 金管楽器用ミュート: カップミュート; ハーマンミュート; プランジャーミュート; プラクティスミュート; ストレートミュート
el: Τέχνες & Ψυχαγωγία > Χόμπι & Δημιουργικές Τέχνες > Αξεσουάρ μουσικών οργάνων & ορχήστρας > Αξεσουάρ χάλκινων πνευστών οργάνων > Σιγαστήρες χάλκινων πνευστών οργάνων: Σιγαστήρες κυπέλλου; Σιγαστήρες Harmon; Σιγαστήρες εμβόλου; Σιγαστήρες πρακτικής; Ευθύγραμμοι σιγαστήρες
fi: Taide ja viihde > Harrastukset ja taiteet > Soitin- ja orkesteritarvikkeet > Vaskipuhallintarvikkeet > Vaskipuhaltimien sordiinot: Sordiinot; Harmon-sordiinot; Säädettävät sordiinot; Harjoitussordiinot; Suorat sordiinot
nb: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og kreativitet > Tilbehør til musikkinstrumenter og orkestre > Tilbehør til messinginstrumenter > Muter til messinginstrumenter: Klokkemuter; Harmonimuter; Stempelmuter; Øvelsesmuter; Rette muter
pt-BR: Artes e entretenimento > Hobbies e artes > Acessórios para instrumentos musicais e orquestras > Acessórios para instrumentos de sopro de metal > Surdinas para instrumentos de sopro de metal: Surdinas de copo; Surdinas Harmon; Surdinas de êmbolo; Surdinas de prática; Surdinas retas
sl-SI: Kultura in zabava > Hobiji in ustvarjalne umetnosti > Dodatki za glasbila in orkestre > Dodatki za trobila > Dušilci za trobila: Cup dušilci; Harmon dušilci; Plunger dušilci; Dušilci za vadbe; Straight dušilci
hu: Művészet és szórakoztatás > Hobbik és kreatív művészet > Hangszer és zenekari kiegészítők > Rézfúvóshangszer-kiegészítő > Rézfúvóshangszer-némítók: Kupaknémítók; Harmonnémítók; Dugattyúnémítók; Gyakorlónémítók; Egyenes némítók
fr: Arts et loisirs > Loisirs et arts créatifs > Accessoires pour instruments de musique et orchestres > Accessoires pour cuivres > Sourdines pour cuivres: Sourdines bol; Sourdines Harmon; Sourdines plunger; Sourdines d’entraînement; Sourdines droites
it: Arte e svago > Hobby e arti creative > Accessori per orchestre e strumenti musicali > Accessori per ottoni > Sordine per ottoni: Sordine per coppe; Sordine Harmon; Sordine a stantuffo; Sordine pratiche; Sordine dritte
en: Arts & Entertainment > Hobbies & Creative Arts > Musical Instrument & Orchestra Accessories > Brass Instrument Accessories > Brass Instrument Mutes: Cup Mutes; Harmon Mutes; Plunger Mutes; Practice Mutes; Straight Mutes
sv: Konst och underhållning > Hobby och skapande > Tillbehör till musikinstrument > Tillbehör till bleckblåsinstrument > Sordiner för bleckblåsinstrument: Rund dämpare; Harmon-dämpare; Kolvdämpare; Övningsdämpare; Raka dämpare
es: Arte y ocio > Hobbies y artes creativas > Accesorios para instrumentos musicales y de orquesta > Accesorios para instrumentos de metal > Sordinas para instrumentos de metal: Sordinas de copa; Sordinas Harmon; Sordinas de émbolo; Sordinas de práctica; Sordinas rectas
pl: Sztuka i rozrywka > Hobby i sztuki piękne > Akcesoria do instrumentów muzycznych > Akcesoria do instrumentów dętych blaszanych > Tłumiki do instrumentów dętych blaszanych: Tłumiki cup; Tłumiki harmon; Tłumiki plunger; Tłumiki do ćwiczeń; Tłumiki proste
sk-SK: Umenie a zábava > Záľuby a tvorivé dielne > Príslušenstvo pre hudobné nástroje > Príslušenstvo pre dychové nástroje > Dusítka dychových nástrojov: Kalichové dusítka; Dusítko Harmon; Piestové dusítka; Cvičné dusítka; Rovné dusítka
zh-CN: 艺术与娱乐 > 爱好/艺术创作 > 乐器与管弦乐队配件 > 铜管乐器配件 > 铜管乐器弱音器: 杯型弱音器; 哈蒙弱音器; 橡胶搋子弱音器; 练习弱音器; 直型弱音器
ko: 아트/엔터테인먼트 > 취미/예술 > 악기/오케스트라 부대용품 > 금관악기 부대용품 > 금관악기 뮤트: 컵 뮤트; 하몬 뮤트; 플런저 뮤트; 프렉티스 뮤트; 스트레이트 뮤트